Washington statutes.
RCW 4.100.040

Claims—Evidence, determinations required—Dismissal of claim.

(1) In order to file an actionable claim for compensation under this chapter, the claimant must establish by documentary evidence that:

(a) The claimant has been convicted of one or more felonies in superior court and subsequently sentenced to a term of imprisonment, and has served all or part of the sentence;

(b)(i) The claimant is not currently incarcerated for any offense; and

(ii) During the period of confinement for which the claimant is seeking compensation, the claimant was not serving a term of imprisonment or a concurrent sentence for any crime other than the felony or felonies that are the basis for the claim;

(c)(i) The claimant has been pardoned on grounds consistent with innocence for the felony or felonies that are the basis for the claim; or

(ii) The claimant's judgment of conviction was reversed or vacated and the charging document dismissed on the basis of significant new exculpatory information or, if a new trial was ordered pursuant to the presentation of significant new exculpatory information, either the claimant was found not guilty at the new trial or the claimant was not retried and the charging document dismissed; and

(d) The claim is not time barred by RCW 4.100.090.

(2) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this section, the claimant must state facts in sufficient detail for the finder of fact to determine that:

(a) The claimant did not engage in any illegal conduct alleged in the charging documents; and

(b) The claimant did not commit or suborn perjury, or fabricate evidence to cause or bring about the conviction. A guilty plea to a crime the claimant did not commit, or a confession that is later determined by a court to be false, does not automatically constitute perjury or fabricated evidence under this subsection.

(3) Convictions vacated, overturned, or subject to resentencing pursuant to In re: Personal Detention of Andress, 147 Wn.2d 602 (2002) may not serve as the basis for a claim under this chapter unless the claimant otherwise satisfies the qualifying criteria set forth in RCW 4.100.020 and this section.

(4) The claimant must verify the claim unless he or she is incapacitated, in which case the personal representative or agent filing on behalf of the claimant must verify the claim.

(5) If the attorney general concedes that the claimant was wrongly convicted, the court must award compensation as provided in RCW 4.100.060.

(6)(a) If the attorney general does not concede that the claimant was wrongly convicted and the court finds after reading the claim that the claimant does not meet the filing criteria set forth in this section, it may dismiss the claim, either on its own motion or on the motion of the attorney general.

(b) If the court dismisses the claim, the court must set forth the reasons for its decision in written findings of fact and conclusions of law.

[ 2013 c 175 s 4.]